Connecticut, session 2026, SB00473.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of section 7-459e of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(4) Each participating municipality shall contribute to the MERS
defined contribution plan an amount equal to the contributions required
under subdivision (2) of [subsection (b) of this section] this subsection
from members participating in MERS 2.0 who are employees of such
municipality.
Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 22a-133y of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) On or after the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to
section 22a-134tt, any licensed environmental professional licensed by
the State Board of Examiners of Environmental Professionals pursuant
to section 22a-133v may, pursuant to prevailing standards and
guidelines, conduct a parcel-wide Phase II environmental site
assessment and a parcel-wide Phase III investigation, for any parcel of

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
real property which has, or which may have been, subject to a release,
as defined in section 22a-134pp, for the purposes of entering such parcel
into a voluntary parcel-wide remediation program pursuant to
subsections (f) to (k), inclusive, of this section, except as provided by
subsection (g) of this section. Any such professional employed by a
municipality may enter, without liability, upon any property within
such municipality for the purpose of performing an environmental site
assessment or investigation if the owner of such property is unknown
or such property is encumbered by a lien for taxes due to such
municipality, or as otherwise provided for pursuant to section [22-
133dd] 22a-133d. Nothing in subsections (f) to (k), inclusive, of this
section shall affect the ability of any person, firm or corporation to
provide any of the services described in this subsection in connection
with the remediation of contaminated real property other than as
provided for a voluntary parcel-wide remediation conducted pursuant
to subsections (f) to (k), inclusive, of this section.
Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 42a-9-204 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a
security agreement may create or provide for a security interest in after-
acquired collateral.
Sec. 4. Subdivision (1) of section 42a-10-105 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(1) Transactions validly entered into after October 1, 1961, and before
October 1, 1976, and which were subject to the provisions of title 42a of
the general statutes, revised to 1975, and which would be subject to
subsection (2) of section 42a-1-105, subsections (9) and (37) of section
42a-1-201 of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, subsections
Public Act No. 26-11 2 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
(1) and (2) of section 42a-2-107, subsection (2) of section 42a-5-116,
subsection (1) of section 42a-9-102 of the general statutes, revised to
January 1, 2001, sections 42a-9-103a to 42a-9-106, inclusive, of the
general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-114 of the general
statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-203 to 42a-9-205, inclusive, of
the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-301 of the general
statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-302 of the general statutes,
revised to January 1, 2001, subsections (1) and (5) of section 42a-9-304 of
the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, sections 42a-9-305 to 42a-
9-308, inclusive, of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-
9-312 of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-313 of the
general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-318 of the general
statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-401 to 42a-9-407, inclusive, of
the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, 42a-9-408a of the general
statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, subsection (3) of section 42a-9-501 of
the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, subsection (2) of section
42a-9-502 of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, section 42a-
9-504 of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, subsection (2) of
section 42a-9-505 of the general statutes, revised to January 1, 2001, and
sections 42a-10-105 to 42a-10-109, inclusive, as amended by this act, if
they had been entered into after October 1, 1976, and the rights, duties
and interests flowing from such transactions remain valid after the latter
date and may be terminated, completed, consummated or enforced as
required or permitted by this title, as amended. Security interests arising
out of such transactions which are perfected on October 1, 1976, shall
remain perfected until they lapse as provided in this title, as amended,
and may be continued as permitted by this title, as amended, except as
stated in section [42-10-106] 42a-10-106.
Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 42a-12A-301 of the 2026 supplement
to the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-11 3 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
(a) Except as provided in [sections 42a-12A-101 and 42a-12A-102] this
part, articles 9 and 12 apply to a transaction, lien or other interest in
property, even if the transaction, lien or interest was entered into,
created or acquired before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. Subsection (a) of section 46b-122a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) There shall be a presumption in juvenile proceedings that all
mechanical restraints shall be removed from a preadjudicated detained
child prior to and throughout the detainee's appearance in court. In
juvenile proceedings, in-court use of mechanical restraints on
preadjudicated detainees shall be by order of the court and pursuant to
Judicial Branch written policy. The Judicial Branch shall keep statistics
on the use of mechanical restraints on a child during proceedings and,
notwithstanding any provision of section 46b-124, shall provide such
statistics to any member of the public upon request, provided any
identifying information concerning a [juvenile] child is redacted.
Sec. 7. Subdivision (15) of section 46b-601 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(15) "Tribunal" means a court, arbitrator, administrative agency or
other body acting in an adjudicative capacity which, after presentation
of evidence or legal argument, has jurisdiction to render a decision
affecting a party's interests in a matter.
Sec. 8. Subsection (c) of section 46b-608 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) A collaborative lawyer or a lawyer in a law firm with which the
collaborative lawyer is associated may represent a party to: (1) Ask a
Public Act No. 26-11 4 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
tribunal to approve an agreement resulting from the collaborative law
process; or (2) seek or defend an emergency order to protect the health,
safety, welfare or interest of a party or household member, as defined in
section 46b-38a, if a successor lawyer is not immediately available to
represent the party or household member, [;] in which case [,] a
collaborative lawyer, or lawyer in a law firm with which the
collaborative lawyer is associated, may represent such party or
household member only until the person is represented by a successor
lawyer or reasonable measures are taken to protect the health, safety,
welfare or interest of the person.
Sec. 9. Subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 47-36aa of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) Required notice of the [probate court] Probate Court hearing on
the application for an order of sale was not given, provided either (A)
the fiduciary has accounted for the proceeds of the sale in an
administration account that has been approved and accepted by the
court after notice and hearing, and from which order of approval and
acceptance no appeal has been taken, or (B) no action challenging the
validity of the instrument is commenced and no notice of lis pendens is
recorded in the land records of the town or towns where the instrument
is recorded within two years after the instrument is recorded;
Sec. 10. Subsection (c) of section 52-557w of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) Nothing in subsection (b) of this section shall prevent suit or limit
the liability of a private campground owner or operator who in the
operation of the private campground: (1) Commits an act or omission
that constitutes negligence; (2) intentionally causes the injury of another
person; (3) acts with a disregard for the safety of the person injured; (4)
Public Act No. 26-11 5 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
fails to use a degree of care that an ordinarily careful, prudent person
would use under similar circumstances; or (5) fails to conspicuously
post warning signs of a condition known to be dangerous at the private
campground.
Sec. 11. Subdivision (2) of section 52-571o of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) "Firearm industry product" means any of the following which are
or were (A) sold, made or distributed in this state; or (B) possessed in
this state and it was known by the firearm industry member that such
product would be sold, made, distributed or possessed in this state:
(i) Ammunition or a magazine as those terms are defined in section
29-38m;
(ii) A firearm as defined in section 53a-3;
(iii) An unfinished frame or lower receiver as defined in section 53-
206j; or
(iv) A rate of [firearm] fire enhancement as defined in section 53-206g,
as amended by this act.
Sec. 12. Subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of
section 53-206g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
any military personnel stationed or otherwise residing in this state who
is deployed from this state on October 1, 2018, or is under deployment
from this state on said date, and who was in lawful possession of a rate
of [firearm] fire enhancement on September 30, 2018, shall, within
Public Act No. 26-11 6 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
ninety days of returning to this state from deployment, render the rate
of fire enhancement permanently inoperable, remove the rate of fire
enhancement from this state or surrender the rate of fire enhancement
to the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for
destruction.
Sec. 13. Subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of section 54-56r of
the 2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person:
(A) Who has been placed in the pretrial impaired driving intervention
program under this section or the pretrial alcohol education program
established under section 54-56g, within ten years immediately
preceding the application;
(B) Who has been convicted of a violation of section 14-227a, 14-227g,
14-227m, 14-227n, 15-132a, subsection (d) of section 15-133 or section 15-
140l, 15-140n, 53a-56b or 53a-60d;
(C) Who has been convicted in any other state at any time of an
offense the essential elements of which are substantially the same as any
statutory provision set forth in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision;
(D) Who is charged with a violation of section 14-227a, 14-227g, 14-
227m or 14-227n (i) and held a commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit at the time of the violation; or (ii) while
operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 14-1; or
[(3)] (E) Whose alleged violation caused the serious physical injury,
as defined in section 53a-3, of another person, unless good cause is
shown.
Sec. 14. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 54-192h of the 2026
Public Act No. 26-11 7 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 473
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(1) "Administrative warrant" means a warrant, notice to appear,
removal order or warrant of deportation issued by an agent of a federal
agency charged with the enforcement of immigration laws or the
security of the borders, including ICE and the United States Customs
and Border Protection, but does not include a warrant issued or signed
by a judicial officer; [.]
Sec. 15. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 47a-23c of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, this
section applies to any tenant who resides in a building or complex
consisting of five or more separate dwelling units or who resides in a
mobile manufactured home park and who is either: (A) Sixty-two years
of age or older, or whose spouse, sibling, parent or grandparent is sixty-
two years of age or older and permanently resides with that tenant, or
(B) a person with a physical or mental disability, as defined in
subdivision [(12)] (8) of section 46a-64b, or whose spouse, sibling, child,
parent or grandparent is a person with a physical or mental disability
who permanently resides with that tenant, but only if such disability can
be expected to result in death or to last for a continuous period of at least
twelve months.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 7, 2026
Public Act No. 26-11 8 of 8